Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2310
Board; administrative
office.

The board may establish an administrative
office in the State of Nebraska at such place as may be suitable for the furtherance
of the Nebraska Wheat Resources Act. The
board shall not purchase, construct, or otherwise obtain title to its own
administrative office, but shall be limited to leasing state or commercial
office space.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 10, p. 63;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 29;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 5.